Vermont, session 2025-2026, H763.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 17 V.S.A. § 1913 is added to read:
§ 1913. COUNTING OF OFFENDERS
(a) Department of Corrections determination and sharing of offender
residential information.
(1) The Department of Corrections shall:
(A) for each offender in the Department’s custody, determine the
offender’s residential address prior to incarceration; and
(B) maintain an electronic record of offenders’ residential addresses
prior to incarceration that shall determine the offenders’ residential addresses
VT LEG #385083 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.763
2026 Page 2 of 5
prior to incarceration on the date for which the decennial census reports
population.
(2) On or before May 1 of the year following each decennial census
under the authority of Congress and in which the U.S. Census Bureau counts
any offender as a resident of the town in which the offender’s respective
correctional facility is located, the Department of Corrections shall deliver to
the Legislative Apportionment Board, in a form as prescribed by the Board, the
following information as determined on the date for which the decennial
census reports population:
(A) a unique identifier for each offender subject to the
jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections;
(B) the street address of the correctional facility in which each
offender was incarcerated;
(C) for each offender, an indication of whether the offender:
(i) has attained 18 years of age; and
(ii) is serving a sentence of life imprisonment without the
possibility of release;
(D) each offender’s in-state residential address prior to incarceration,
or an indication that the offender’s residential address prior to incarceration
was:
VT LEG #385083 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.763
2026 Page 3 of 5
(i) outside Vermont; or
(ii) unknown; and
(E) any additional information requested by the Board otherwise
permitted by law.
(b) Legislative Apportionment Board use of offender address information.
(1) For each offender included in a report received under subsection (a)
of this section, the Board shall determine the geographic units for which
population counts are reported in the decennial census, which units contain the
address of the correctional facility in which an offender was incarcerated, and
which contain an offender’s residential address prior to incarceration.
(2) If an offender’s residential address prior to incarceration is known
and is located within the State, the Board shall ensure that when creating
proposals for dividing the State into initial districts for the election of the
House of Representatives and the Senate, as described in sections 1905, 1906,
and 1907 of this title, the relevant population counts reported in the decennial
census are adjusted so that an offender is considered to have been residing at
the offender’s residential address prior to incarceration and not at the address
of the correctional facility where the offender was incarcerated.
(3) If an offender’s residential address prior to incarceration is unknown
or not in this State, the Board shall ensure that an offender is not represented in
any applicable population count reported in the decennial census for the
VT LEG #385083 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.763
2026 Page 4 of 5
geographic units that include the correctional facility in which an offender was
incarcerated.
(4) Notwithstanding subdivisions (1)–(3) of this subsection, if an
offender is serving a sentence of life imprisonment without the possibility of
release, the Board shall ensure that an offender is represented in the applicable
population count reported in the decennial census for the geographic units that
include the correctional facility in which an offender was incarcerated.
(5) The Board shall prepare and publish such information, both adjusted
and unadjusted, pursuant to this subsection (b) as part of its tentative proposal,
as described in sections 1905 and 1907 of this title, and any subsequent
proposals, including the Board’s final proposal, as described in section 1906 of
this title.
(c) Confidentiality of offender information. Notwithstanding any other
statute, the information required to be provided under this section shall not
include the name of any offender or in any other way allow for the
identification of the individual. This information is exempt from public
inspection and copying under the Public Records Act and shall be kept
confidential, except to the Board for the purposes of subsection (b) of this
section or as aggregated by decennial census block for the purposes of
subdivision (b)(5) of this section.
VT LEG #385083 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.763
2026 Page 5 of 5
(d) Definition. As used in section, “offender” has the same meaning as in
28 V.S.A. § 3(8).
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385083 v.1